src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1ateq_tptZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Pl:%>it	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatiga	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataa	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatini	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aaterput	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>artarput	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatersi	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>ertarsi	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataat	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>ertaat	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatertik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>ertartik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>ip	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Pl:%>it	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-p	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatima	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aativit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataata	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatimi	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitta	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>ertatta	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissi	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%ertassi	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataata	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>ertaata	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatimik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>ertamik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCmmut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Pl:%>inut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataanut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatiminut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>ertatsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>ertassinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataannut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>ertaannut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatiminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>ertaminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmmit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>init	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataanit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatiminit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>ertatsinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>ertassinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataannit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>ertaannit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatiminnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>ertaminnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmmiit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>iniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-miit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataaniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatiminiit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>ertatsinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>ertassinniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataanniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>ertaanniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatiminniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>ertaminniit	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCmmi	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mi	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Pl:%>ini	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatinni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatinni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataani	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatimini	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>ertatsinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>ertassinni	LokVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataanni	LokVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>ertaanni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatiminni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>ertaminni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>tut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>itut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-tut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Pl:%>itut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>ituut	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-tuut	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatittut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatittut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataatut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatimisut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsitut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>ertatsitut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissitut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>ertassitut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataattut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>ertaattut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatimittut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>ertamittut	AeqVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCmmik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Pl:%>inik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataanik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatiminik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:%>ertatsinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:%>ertassinnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataannik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+3PlPoss:%>ertaannik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatiminnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+4PlPoss:%>ertaminnik	Krestr ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg:%>ikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Pl:%>itigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-kkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataagut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatimigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+1PlPoss:%>ertatsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+2PlPoss:%>ertassigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
